Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.540.080

Failure of nonhigh districts to submit proposal to vote within time limits—Annexation procedure.

In case of failure or refusal by a board of directors of a nonhigh school district to submit a proposal or proposals to a vote of the electors within the time limit specified in RCW 28A.540.060 and 28A.540.070, the regional committee on school district reorganization may initiate a proposal for annexation of such nonhigh school district as provided for in RCW 28A.540.070.

[ 1990 c 33 s 487; 1985 c 385 s 37; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.56.070. Prior: 1959 c 262 s 8; 1955 c 344 s 7; 1953 c 229 s 7. Formerly RCW 28A.56.070, 28.56.070.]

NOTES:

Severability—1985 c 385: See note following RCW 28A.315.025.